Hawaii statutes.
[§438-8.5] Medical clearance. The
board, at its discretion may request any barber to submit to such medical
clearance tests, including blood tests, as the board deems appropriate to
protect the public health. [L 1986, c 138, §8]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next